District of Columbia statutes.
47-1010.01

Real property tax exemption.

(a)

That portion of real property designated as Lots 37, 40, 824-825, 829-832, 859, 880-882, 887, 890, and 892 in Square 677 in the District of Columbia that is used to secure a rent or income from a tenant that is exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. § 501] as an organization described in § 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), or (c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. § 501], and that occupies space in the improvements, shall be afforded real property tax relief.

(b)

That portion of real property designated as Lots 45, 49, 51, 834-842, 869-871, 883, 888-889, 891, 893, and 895-896 in Square 677 in the District of Columbia that is used to secure a rent or income from a tenant that is exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. § 501] as an organization described in § 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), or (c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. § 501], and that occupies space in the improvements, shall be afforded real property tax relief.

(c)

Subject to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section, the real property tax relief granted by subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall apply only during the time that:

(1)

The real property is owned by the Center for Public Administration and Service, Inc., or its successors or assigns; and

(2)

The improvements to be constructed on either the land described in subsection (a) of this section or the land described in subsection (b) of this section are used as the headquarters of the Metropolitan Washington Council of Governments, the International City Management Association, and the International City Management Association Retirement Corporation.

(d)

The real property tax relief granted by subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall consist of:

(1)

An exemption from real property taxation from the date of acquisition of the land by the Center for Public Administration and Service, Inc., or its successors or assigns, until the completion of the fifth real property tax year beginning after the date of issuance of the final certificate of occupancy for the improvements to be constructed on the land; and

(2)

A 50% reduction in the real property tax from the completion of the fifth real property tax year beginning after the date of issuance of the final certificate of occupancy for the improvements to be constructed on the land until the completion of the tenth real property tax year beginning after the date of issuance of the final certificate of occupancy.

(e)

The provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009 shall apply with respect to the real property tax relief granted by this section.

(f)

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this section.

History

Dec. 24, 1942, ch. 826, § 8
as added May 24, 1988, D.C. Law 7-125, § 2, 35 DCR 2878
July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 11, 36 DCR 4160
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1010.1.

References in Text

Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in (a) and (b), is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 501.